Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.230

Residential time summary report form.

(1) The administrative office of the courts in consultation with the department of social and health services, division of child support, shall develop a residential time summary report form to provide for the reporting of summary information in every case in which residential time with children is to be established or modified.

(2) The residential time summary report must include at a minimum: A breakdown of residential schedules with a reasonable degree of specificity regarding actual time with each parent, including enforcement practices, representation status of the parties, whether domestic violence, child abuse, chemical dependency, or mental health issues exist, and whether the matter was agreed or contested.

[ 2017 c 183 s 3; 2007 c 496 s 702.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2007 c 496: See note following RCW 26.09.002.